src/fst/morphology/stems/noun_stems.lexc
!! îsa:îs NA_SG/A_POSS/IM "clam; shell" ; ! AEW NA-4 (Vowel-Initial Single-Syllable NA Stem)
!! wâhkwa:wâhkw NA_SG/A_POSS/IM "roe, fish eggs; lump of roe" ; ! AEW NA-4w (Consonant-Initial Single-Syllable-/w/ NA Stem)
!! ihkwa:ihkw NA_SG/A_POSS/IM "louse" ; ! AEW NA-4w (Vowel-Initial Single-Syllable-/w/ NA Stem)
!! ! ! Non-AEW NA test cases
!! ! âmow NA_POSS/IM "bee" ;
!! ! maskwa:maskw NA_SG/A_POSS/IM "bear" ;
!! ! sîsîp NA_POSS/IM "duck" ;
!! ! Inanimate Noun stems
!! askiy NI "land" ;
!! cîmân NI "canoe" ; ! AEW NI-1 (Consonant-Initial Regular NI Stem)
!! astotin NI "hat" ; ! AEW NI-1 (Vowel-Initial Regular NI Stem)
!! maskihkiy NI "medicine" ; ! AEW NI-2 (Consonant-Initial VW NI Stem)
!! mîkisasâkay NI "beaded coat, beaded dress" ; ! AEW NI-2 (Consonant-Initial VW NI Stem)
!! oskasâkay NI "new coat, new dress" ; ! AEW NI-2 (Vowel-Initial VW NI Stem)
!! ! pahkîkin:pahkîkinw NI "leather, rawhide" ; ! AEW NI-3 (Consonant-Initial Cw NI Stem)
!! kotawânâpisk:kotawânâpiskw NI ; ! AEW NI-3 (Consonant-Initial Cw NI Stem)
!! nipîwikamik:nipîwikamikw NI ; ! AEW NI-3 (Consonant-Initial Cw NI Stem)
!! ! askîkin:askîkinw NI "fresh rawhide" ; ! AEW NI-3 (Vowel-Initial Cw NI Stem)
!! wâwi:wâw2 NI_SG/I_POSS/IM "egg" ; ! AEW NI-4 (Consonant-Initial Single-Syllable NI Stem)
!! osk-âyi:osk-ây4 NI_SG/I_POSS/IM "new item, new thing" ; ! AEW NI-4 (Vowel-Initial Single-Syllable NI Stem)
!! @P.number.SG@misko:@P.number.SG@miskw NI_SG/I_POSS/IM "blood" ; ! AEW NI-4w (Consonant-Initial Single-Syllable-/w/ NI Stem)
!! ! Irregular stem cases
!! ! Suppletive atimw-/-têm-
!! @R.person.NULL@atim:@R.person.NULL@atimw NA "dog, beast of burden" ; ! Regular stem of 'atim': 'atimw' (cannot be possessed)
!! @D.person.NULL@atim:@D.person.NULL@tîm NA "dog, beast of burden" ;   ! Irregular suppletive stem of 'atim': '-tîm' (must be possessed)
!! ! !! Semi-suppletive kîhtî-aya/kîhcî-aya ! This is not part of the latest AEW noun paradigm sets, so probably should be excluded
!! ! @R.person.NULL@kîhtî-aya:@R.person.NULL@kîhtî-ay4 NA_SG/A_POSS/IM "elder" ; ! AEW NA-4 (Consonant-Initial Single-Syllable NA Stem)
!! ! @D.person.NULL@kîhtî-aya:@D.person.NULL@kîhcî-ayim NA "elder" ; ! AEW NA-4 (Consonant-Initial Single-Syllable NA Stem)
!! kîhtî-aya:kîhtî-ay4 NA_SG/A_POSS/IM ; ! AEW NA-4 (Consonant-Initial Single-Syllable NA Stem)
!! !! Regular/Irregular ôsi- both a regularly inflecting stem, and a number of irregular forms enumerated separately
!! ôsi:ôs NI_SG/I_POSS/IM "canoe, boat" ; ! AEW NI-4 (Vowel-Initial Single-Syllable irregular NI Stem)
!! ! Subset of lexicalized Diminutive Animate Independent stems
!! @P.dim.DIM@ NOUN_INDEP_DIM_STEMS ;
!! 
!! ! Sub-continuation lexicon for lexicalized diminutive stems
!! LEXICON NOUN_INDEP_DIM_STEMS
!! acimos NA "puppy" ; !
!! ôcisis NI "small canoe" ; !

!! Complete extraction of lemma:stem info from LLR dictionary 2022, according to
!! LEXC structure in the new cwd FST.

LEXICON NOUN_DEP_KINSHIP_STEMS
nîstâw:îstâw NAD_DIM/ISIS ;
nimôsom:môsom NAD_DIM/IS ;
nîtimomâw:îtimomâw NID_DIM/ISIS ;
niciwâmiskwîw:ciwâmiskwîw NAD_DIM/ISIS ;
nikâwiy:kâwiy NAD_DIM/ISIS ;
nistîs:stîs NAD_DIM/IS ;
nitânis:tânis NAD_DIM/IS ;
nitânisîhkâwin:tânisîhkâwin NAD_DIM/IS ;
nitîhkwatim:tîhkwatim NAD_DIM/IS ;
nitôsim:tôsim NAD_DIM/IS ;
ninâpîm:nâpîm NAD_DIM/IS ;
nîci-nâpîw NAD_DIM/ISIS ;
nîcisân:îcisân NAD_DIM/IS ;
nîki:îk NID_SG/I_DIM/IS ;
nîscâs:îscâs NAD_DIM/IS ;
nîtim:îtimw NAD_DIM/IS ;
nîwa:îw2 NAD_SG/A_DIM/IS ;
niciwâm:ciwâm NAD_DIM/IS ;
nimis:mis NAD_DIM/IS ;
nisîmis:sîmis NAD_DIM/IS ;
nisikos:sikos NAD_DIM/IS ;
nistim:stim NAD_DIM/IS ;
nitîhkwatim:tîhkwatim NAD_DIM/IS ;
nitôsis:tôsis NAD_DIM/IS ;
nitôtîm:tôtîm NAD_DIM/IS ;
nôhkom:ohkom NAD_DIM/IS ;
nôsisim:ôsisim NAD_DIM/IS ;
nicâhkos:câhkos NAD_DIM/IS ;
ocâpiskâkaniwîsiw NAD_DIM/IS ;
nôhkomis:ohkomis NAD_DIM/IS ;
nikâwîs:kâwîs NAD_DIM/IS ;
nîcimos:îcimos NAD_DIM/IS ;
nîstâw:îstâw NAD_DIM/IS ;
